North Carolina statutes. Chapter 75A. Boating and Water Safety.
Article 1. Boating Safety Act.
§ 75A-10.3.
Death or serious injury by impaired boating; repeat offenses.

Death by Impaired Boating. — A person commits the offense of death by impaired boating if all of the following apply:

The person unintentionally causes the death of another person.

The person was engaged in the offense of impaired boating under G.S. 75A-10(b1).

The commission of the offense in subdivision (2) of this subsection is the proximate cause of the death.

Serious Injury by Impaired Boating. — A person commits the offense of serious injury by impaired boating if all of the following apply:

The person unintentionally causes serious injury to another person.

The person was engaged in the offense of impaired boating under G.S. 75A-10(b1).

The commission of the offense in subdivision (2) of this subsection is the proximate cause of the serious injury.

Aggravated Serious Injury by Impaired Boating. — A person commits the offense of aggravated serious injury by impaired boating if all of the following apply:

The person unintentionally causes serious injury to another person.

The person was engaged in the offense of impaired boating under G.S. 75A-10(b1).

The commission of the offense in subdivision (2) of this subsection is the proximate cause of the serious injury.

The person has a previous conviction of impaired boating under G.S. 75A-10(b1) within seven years of the date of the offense.

Aggravated Death by Impaired Boating. — A person commits the offense of aggravated death by impaired boating if all of the following apply:

The person unintentionally causes the death of another person.

The person was engaged in the offense of impaired boating under G.S. 75A-10(b1).

The commission of the offense in subdivision (2) of this subsection is the proximate cause of the death.

The person has a previous conviction of impaired boating under G.S. 75A-10(b1) within seven years of the date of the offense.

Repeat Death by Impaired Boating. — A person commits the offense of repeat death by impaired boating if all of the following apply:

The person commits an offense under subsection (a) or subsection (d) of this section.

The person has a previous conviction under at least one of the following:

Subsection (a) of this section.

Subsection (d) of this section.

G.S. 14-17

or

G.S. 14-18

, and the basis of the conviction was the unintentional death of another person while engaged in the offense of impaired boating under G.S. 75A-10(b1).

The pleading and proof of previous convictions shall be in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 15A-928

.

Punishments. — Unless the conduct is covered under some other provision of law providing greater punishment, the following classifications apply to the offenses set forth in this section:

Repeat death by impaired boating is a Class B2 felony.

Aggravated death by impaired boating is a Class D felony. Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 15A-1340.17

, the court shall sentence the defendant in the aggravated range of the appropriate Prior Record Level.

Death by impaired boating is a Class D felony. Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 15A-1340.17

, intermediate punishment is authorized for a defendant who is a Prior Record Level I offender.

Aggravated serious injury by impaired boating is a Class E felony.

Serious injury by impaired boating is a Class F felony.

No Double Prosecutions. — No person who has been placed in jeopardy upon a charge of death by impaired boating may be prosecuted for the offense of manslaughter arising out of the same death; and no person who has been placed in jeopardy upon a charge of manslaughter may be prosecuted for death by impaired boating arising out of the same death.

History.

2016-34, s. 2.

§ 75A-11.
Duty of operator involved in collision, accident, casualty, or other occurrence.

For the purposes of this section, the term “occurrence” means a collision, accident, casualty, or other similar occurrence involving a vessel. The operator of a vessel involved in an occurrence, so far as the operator is able to do so without serious danger to the operator’s vessel, crew, and passengers (if any), shall render persons affected by the occurrence any assistance as may be practicable and necessary in order to save them from or minimize any danger caused by the occurrence, and also to give the operator’s name, address, and identification of the operator’s vessel in writing to any person injured and to the owner of any property damaged in the occurrence.

If an occurrence results in the death, injury, or disappearance indicating death or injury of a person or damage to a vessel or other property of two thousand dollars ($2,000) or more, or if there is complete loss of any vessel, the operator of the vessel shall file with the Commission a full description of the occurrence, including any information the agency may, by rule, require. If an occurrence results in death, disappearance, or injury, the operator of the vessel shall file the report with the Commission within 48 hours of the occurrence. If the occurrence results in vessel or property damage, or complete loss of any vessel, the operator of the vessel shall file the report with the Commission within 10 days of the occurrence. When the operator of the vessel cannot submit the report, the owner of the vessel shall submit the report. Reports filed pursuant to this subsection shall not be admissible as evidence.

When, as a result of an occurrence that involves a vessel or its equipment, a person dies or disappears from a vessel, the operator of the vessel shall, without delay and by the most expeditious means available, notify the nearest law enforcement agency of all of the following:

The date, time, and exact location of the occurrence.

The name of each person who died or disappeared.

The certificate of number and name of the vessel.

The name and address of the vessel owner or owners and the vessel operator.

If the operator of the vessel cannot give notice required by this section, each person on board the vessel shall notify the law enforcement agency or determine that notice has been given. Upon receiving notice under this section, a law enforcement agency shall immediately provide the Commission and the United States Coast Guard with the information required by this section.

History.

1959, c. 1064, s. 11; 1999-248, s. 3; 2006-185, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-185, s. 1, effective January 1, 2007, and applicable to offenses committed on or after January 1, 2007, rewrote subsections (a) and (b) and added subsections (c) and (d).

§ 75A-12.
Furnishing information to agency of United States.

In accordance with any request duly made by an authorized official or agency of the United States, any information compiled or otherwise available to the Commission pursuant to G.S. 75A-11(b) shall be transmitted to the requesting official or agency of the United States.

History.

1959, c. 1064, s. 12; 2006-185, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-185, s. 1, effective January 1, 2007, and applicable to offenses committed on or after January 1, 2007, deleted “Wildlife Resources” preceding “Commission” near the middle and substituted “the requesting” for “said” near the end.

§ 75A-13.
Water skis, surfboards, etc.

No person shall operate a vessel on any water of this State for towing a person or persons on water skis, a surfboard, or similar device unless at least one of the following conditions is met:

There is in the vessel a person, in addition to the operator, in a position to observe the progress of the person or persons being towed.

The persons being towed wear a personal flotation device.

The vessel is equipped with a rear view mirror.

No person shall operate a vessel on any water of this State towing a person or persons on water skis, a surfboard, or similar device, nor shall any person engage in water skiing, surfboarding, or similar activity at any time between the hours from one hour after sunset to one hour before sunrise.

The provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section do not apply to a performer engaged in a professional exhibition.

No person shall operate or manipulate any vessel, tow rope, or other device by which the direction or location of water skis, a surfboard, or similar device may be affected or controlled in such a way as to cause the water skis, surfboard, or similar device, or any person thereon to collide with any object or person.

History.

1959, c. 1064, s. 13; 2006-185, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-185, s. 1, effective January 1, 2007, and applicable to offenses committed on or after January 1, 2007, in subsection (a), in the introductory paragraph, deleted “or” preceding “a surfboard” near the middle, substituted “unless at least one of the following conditions is met:” for “unless there” at the end, added the subdivision designations, in subdivision (a)(1), substituted “There is in the vessel” for “is in such a vessel” and substituted “towed.” for “towed or unless the skiers”, substituted “The persons being towed wear a personal flotation device” for “wear a life preserver or unless the boat” in subdivision (a)(2), and added “The vessel” at the beginning of subdivision (a)(3); and deleted “or a person or persons engaged in an activity authorized under

G.S. 75A-14

” following “exhibition” at the end of subsection (c).

§ 75A-13.1.
Skin and scuba divers.

No person shall engage in skin diving or scuba diving in the waters of this State that are open to boating, or assist in such diving, without displaying a diver’s flag from a mast, buoy, or other structure at the place of diving; and no person shall display such flag except when diving operations are under way or in preparation.

The diver’s flag shall be square, not less than 12 inches on a side, and shall be of red background with a diagonal white stripe, of a width equal to one fifth of the flag’s height, running from the upper corner adjacent to the mast downward to the opposite outside corner.

No operator of a vessel under way in the waters of this State shall permit the vessel to approach closer than 50 feet to any structure from which a diver’s flag is then being displayed, except where the flag is so positioned as to constitute an unreasonable obstruction to navigation; and no person shall engage in skin diving or scuba diving or display a diver’s flag in any locality that will unreasonably obstruct vessels from making legitimate navigational use of the water.

A person who violates a provision of this section is responsible for an infraction as provided in

G.S. 14-3.1

.

History.

1969, c. 97, s. 1; 2006-185, s. 1; 2013-360, s. 18B.15(b); 2013-380, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-185, s. 1, effective January 1, 2007, and applicable to offenses committed on or after January 1, 2007, substituted “that” for “which” in the middle of subsection (a); in subsection (c), substituted “the” for “such” twice and substituted “that” for “at which the same” near the end; and added subsection (d).

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 18B.15(b), effective December 1, 2013, substituted “responsible for an infraction as provided in

G.S. 14-3.1

” for “guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and shall only be subject to a fine not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” in subsection (d). For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2013-380, s. 6, effective December 1, 2013, substituted “responsible for an infraction as provided in G.S. 14-13.1” for “guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and shall only be subject to a fine not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” in subsection (d). For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 75A-13.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-447, s. 3.

§ 75A-13.3.
Personal watercraft.

No person shall operate a personal watercraft on the waters of this State at any time between sunset and sunrise. For purposes of this section, “personal watercraft” means a small vessel that uses an outboard or propeller-driven motor, or an inboard motor powering a water jet pump, as its primary source of motive power and which is designed to be operated by a person sitting, standing, or kneeling on, or being towed behind the vessel, rather than in the conventional manner of sitting or standing inside the vessel.

(a1)

No person shall operate a personal watercraft on the waters of this State at greater than no-wake speed within 100 feet of an anchored or moored vessel, a dock, pier, swim float, marked swimming area, swimmers, surfers, persons engaged in angling, or any manually operated propelled vessel, unless the personal watercraft is operating in a narrow channel. No person shall operate a personal watercraft in a narrow channel at greater than no-wake speed within 50 feet of an anchored or moored vessel, a dock, pier, swim float, marked swimming area, swimmers, surfers, persons engaged in angling, or any manually operated propelled vessel.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, no person under 16 years of age shall operate a personal watercraft on the waters of this State, and it is unlawful for the owner of a personal watercraft or a person who has temporary or permanent responsibility for a person under the age of 16 to knowingly allow that person to operate a personal watercraft. A person of at least 14 years of age but under 16 years of age may operate a personal watercraft on the waters of this State if:

The person is accompanied by a person of at least 18 years of age who physically occupies the watercraft and who is in compliance with

G.S. 75A-16.2

; or

The person (i) possesses on his or her person while operating the watercraft, identification showing proof of age and a boating safety certification card issued by the Commission, proof of other satisfactory completion of a boating safety education course approved by the National Association of State Boating Law Administrators (NASBLA), or proof of other boating safety education in compliance with

G.S. 75A-16.2

; and (ii) produces that identification and proof upon the request of an officer of the Commission or local law enforcement agency.

(b1)

A person who is the lawful owner of a personal watercraft or a person having control of a personal watercraft who knowingly allows a person under 16 years of age to operate a personal watercraft in violation of the provisions of subsection (b) of this section is responsible for an infraction as provided in

G.S. 14-3.1

.

No livery shall lease, hire, or rent a personal watercraft to or for operation by a person under 16 years of age, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

(c1)

No person, firm, or corporation shall engage in the business of renting personal watercraft to the public for operation by the rentee unless the person, firm, or corporation has secured insurance for the liability of the person, firm, or corporation and that of the rentee, in such an amount as is hereinafter provided, from an insurance company duly authorized to sell liability insurance in this State. Each personal watercraft rented must be covered by a policy of liability insurance insuring the owner and rentee and their agents and employees while in the performance of their duties against loss from any liability imposed by law for damages including damages for care and loss of services because of bodily injury to or death of any person and injury to or destruction of property caused by accident arising out of the operation of such personal watercraft, subject to the following minimum limits: three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) per occurrence.

(c2)

A vessel livery that fails to carry liability insurance in violation of subsection (c1) of this section is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor and shall only be subject to a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(c3)

A vessel livery shall provide the operator of a leased personal watercraft with basic safety instruction prior to allowing the operation of the leased personal watercraft. “Basic safety instruction” shall include direction on how to safely operate the personal watercraft and a review of the safety provisions of this section. A vessel livery that fails to provide basic safety instruction is responsible for an infraction as provided in

G.S. 14-3.1

.

No person shall operate a personal watercraft on the waters of this State, nor shall the owner of a personal watercraft knowingly allow another person to operate that personal watercraft on the waters of this State, unless:

Each person riding on or being towed behind the vessel is wearing a type I, type II, type III, or type V personal flotation device approved by the United States Coast Guard. Inflatable personal flotation devices do not satisfy this requirement; and

In the case of a personal watercraft equipped by the manufacturer with a lanyard-type engine cut-off switch, the lanyard is securely attached to the person, clothing, or flotation device of the operator at all times while the personal watercraft is being operated in such a manner to turn off the engine if the operator dismounts while the watercraft is in operation.

(d1)

No person shall operate a personal watercraft towing another person on water skis, a surfboard, or similar device unless:

(1)

The personal watercraft has on board, in addition to the operator, an observer who shall monitor the progress of the person or persons being towed, or the personal watercraft is equipped with a rearview mirror; and

(2)

The total number of persons operating, observing, and being towed does not exceed the number of passengers identified by the manufacturer as the maximum safe load for the vessel.

A personal watercraft must at all times be operated in a reasonable and prudent manner. Maneuvers that endanger life, limb, or property shall constitute reckless operation of a vessel as provided in

G.S. 75A-10

, and include any of the following:

Unreasonably or unnecessarily weaving through congested vessel traffic.

Jumping the wake of another vessel within 100 feet of the other vessel or when visibility around the other vessel is obstructed.

Intentionally approaching another vessel in order to swerve at the last possible moment to avoid collision.

Repealed by Session Laws 2000-52, s. 2.

Operating contrary to the “rules of the road” or following too closely to another vessel, including another personal watercraft. For purposes of this subdivision, “following too closely” means proceeding in the same direction and operating at a speed in excess of 10 miles per hour when approaching within 100 feet to the rear or 50 feet to the side of another vessel that is underway unless that vessel is operating in a narrow channel, in which case a personal watercraft may operate at the speed and flow of other vessel traffic.

The provisions of this section do not apply to a performer engaged in a professional exhibition, a person or persons engaged in an activity authorized under

G.S. 75A-14

, or a person attempting to rescue another person who is in danger of losing life or limb.

(f1)

For purposes of this section, “narrow channel” means a segment of the waters of the State 300 feet or less in width.

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-447, s. 1.

Nothing in this section prohibits units of local government, marine commissions, or local lake authorities from regulating personal watercraft pursuant to the provisions of

G.S. 160A-176.2

or any other law authorizing such regulation, provided that the regulations are more restrictive than the provisions of this section or regulate aspects of personal watercraft operation that are not covered by this section. Whenever a unit of local government, marine commission, or local lake authority regulates personal watercraft pursuant to this subsection, it shall conspicuously post signs that are reasonably calculated to provide notice to personal watercraft users of the stricter regulations.

History.

1997-129, s. 1; 1999-447, s. 1; 2000-52, ss. 1-4; 2005-161, s. 1; 2006-185, s. 1; 2009-282, s. 2; 2013-360, s. 18B.15(c); 2013-380, ss. 7, 8.

§ 75A-14.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-248, s. 4.

§ 75A-14.1.
Lake Norman No-Wake Zone.

It is unlawful to operate a vessel at greater than no-wake speed within 50 yards of a vessel launching area, bridge, dock, pier, marina, vessel storage structure, or
vessel service area on the waters of Lake Norman.

History.

1997-129, s. 4; 1997-257, s. 10; 1998-217, s. 49; 2006-185, s. 1.

§ 75A-14.2.
Temporary waiver of enforcement of no-wake zones.

The Wildlife Resources Commission may temporarily and conditionally waive enforcement of a no-wake zone upon petition by a unit of local government that encompasses or abuts the no-wake zone if, after investigation of the reasons given for the temporary and conditional waiver, the Commission determines that public safety and the public welfare will not be significantly compromised by the waiver.

History.

2007-46, s. 1.

§ 75A-15.
Rules on water safety; adoption of the United States Aids to Navigation System.

In accordance with subsection (b) of this section, the Commission is empowered to adopt rules, for the local water in question, as to:

Operation of vessels, including restrictions concerning speed zones, and type of activity conducted.

Promotion of boating and water safety generally by occupants of vessels, swimmers, fishermen, and others using the water.

Placement and maintenance of navigation aids and markers, in conformity with governing provisions of law.

Prior to the adoption of any rules, the Commission shall investigate the water recreation and safety needs of the local water in question. In conducting the investigation, the Commission in its discretion may hold public hearings on the rules proposed and the general needs of the local water in question. After completion of the investigation and application of standards, the Commission may in its discretion adopt the rules requested, adopt them in an amended form, or refuse to adopt them. After adoption, the Commission may amend or repeal the rules after first holding a public hearing.

Any subdivision of this State may, but only after public notice, make formal application to the Commission for rules on waters within the subdivision’s territorial limits as to the matters listed in subsection (a) of this section. The Commission may adopt rules applicable to local areas of water defined by the Commission that are found to be heavily used for water recreation purposes by persons from other areas of the State and as to which there is not coordinated local interest in regulation.

(b1)

The Commission may adopt rules to prohibit entry of vessels into public swimming areas and to establish speed zones at public vessel launching ramps, marinas, or vessel service areas and on other congested water areas where there are demonstrated water safety hazards. Enforcement of rules adopted pursuant to this subsection shall be dependent upon placement and maintenance of regulatory markers in accordance with the United States Aids to Navigation System by the Commission or an agency designated by the Commission.

The United States Aids to Navigation System, as established by 33 Code of Federal Regulations Part 62 (July 1, 2005 edition), is hereby adopted for use on the waters of North Carolina. The Commission is authorized to adopt rules implementing the marking system and may:

Modify provisions as necessary to meet the special water recreational and safety needs of this State, provided that the modifications do not depart in any essential manner from the uniform standards being adopted in other states.

Modify provisions as necessary to conform with amendments to the marking system that may be proposed for adoption by the states.

Enact supplementary standards regarding design, construction, placement, and maintenance of markers.

Enact clarifying rules as to matters not covered with precision in the United States Aids to Navigation System.

Enact implementing rules as to matters left to State discretion in the United States Aids to Navigation System.

Enact rules forbidding or restricting the placement of markers either throughout the State or in certain classes or areas of waters without prior permission having been obtained from the Commission or some agency or official designated by the Commission.

(c1)

It is unlawful to place or maintain any marker of the sort covered by the marking system in the waters of North Carolina that does not conform to or is in violation of the marking system and the implementing rules of the Commission.

Rules enacted under the authority of subsections (a), (b), and (b1) of this section shall supersede all local rules in conflict or incompatible with such rules. As used in this subsection, “local rules” shall include provisions relating to boating, water safety, or other recreational use of local waters in special local, or private acts, in ordinances or rules of local governing bodies, or in ordinances or rules of local water authorities. Except as may be authorized in subsections (a), (b), and (b1) of this section, no local rules may be made respecting the United States Aids to Navigation System and its implementation or respecting supplemental safety equipment on vessels.

The Commission may adopt rules prohibiting entry or use by vessels or swimmers of waters of the State immediately surrounding impoundment structures and powerhouses associated with electric generating facilities that are found to pose a hazard to water safety. This subsection shall not apply to the Person-Caswell Lake Authority, Carolina Power and Light Company Lake (Hyco).

History.

1959, c. 1064, s. 15; 1965, c. 394; 1969, c. 1093, s. 4; 1977, c. 424; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1082, ss. 4, 5; 1987, c. 827, s. 5; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 753, s. 3; 2006-185, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-185, s. 1, effective January 1, 2007, and applicable to offenses committed on or after January 1, 2007, rewrote the section.

§ 75A-16.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 830, s. 9, effective July 1, 1980.

Cross References.

For game laws generally, see

G.S. 113-127

et seq.

§ 75A-16.1.
Boating safety course.

The Commission shall institute and coordinate a statewide course of instruction in boating safety, and in so doing may cooperate with any political subdivision of the State or with any reputable organization having as one of its objectives the promotion of boating safety.

The Commission shall designate those persons or agencies authorized to conduct the course of instruction, and this designation shall be valid until revoked by the Commission. Within 30 days of completion of a course of instruction, a designated person or agency shall submit to the Commission a list of the names of all persons who successfully completed the course of instruction conducted by the designated person or agency.

The Commission may conduct the course in boating safety using Commission personnel or other persons at times or in areas in which competent agencies are unable or unwilling to meet the demand for instruction.

The Commission shall issue a boating safety certification card to each person who successfully completes the course of instruction.

The Commission shall adopt rules to provide for the course of instruction and the issuance of boating safety certification cards consistent with the purposes of this section.

Any person who presents a fictitious boating safety certification card or who attempts to obtain a boating safety certification card through fraud is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

2006-185, s. 1.

§ 75A-16.2.
Boating safety education required.

No person shall operate a vessel with a motor of 10 horsepower or greater on the public waters of this State unless the operator has met the requirements for boating safety education.

A person shall be considered in compliance with the requirements of boating safety education if the person does one of the following:

Completes and passes the boating safety course instituted by the Wildlife Resources Commission under

G.S. 75A-16.1

or another boating safety course that is approved by the National Association of State Boating Law Administrators (NASBLA) and accepted by the Wildlife Resources Commission;

Passes a proctored equivalency examination that tests the knowledge of information included in the curriculum of an approved course;

Possesses a valid or expired license to operate a vessel issued to maritime personnel by the United States Coast Guard;

Possesses a State-approved nonrenewable temporary operator’s certificate to operate a vessel for 90 days that was issued with the certificate of number for the vessel, if the boat was new or was sold with a transfer of ownership;

Possesses a rental or lease agreement from a vessel rental or leasing business that lists the person as the authorized operator of the vessel;

Properly displays Commission-issued dealer registration numbers during the demonstration of the vessel;

Operates the vessel under onboard direct supervision of a person who is at least 18 years of age and who meets the requirements of this section;

Demonstrates that he or she is not a resident, is temporarily using the waters of this State for a period not to exceed 90 days, and meets any applicable boating safety education requirements of the state or nation of residency;

Has assumed operation of the vessel due to the illness or physical impairment of the initial operator, and is returning the vessel to shore in order to provide assistance or care for the operator;

Is registered as a commercial fisherman or a person who is under the onboard direct supervision of a commercial fisherman while operating the commercial fisherman’s boat; or

Provides proof that he or she was born before January 1, 1988.Any person who operates a vessel with a motor of 10 horsepower or greater on the waters of this State shall, upon the request of a law enforcement officer, present to the officer a certification card or proof that the person has complied with the provisions of this section.

Any person who violates a provision of this section or a rule adopted pursuant to this section is responsible for an infraction, as provided in

G.S. 14-3.1

, and shall pay a fine of fifty dollars ($50.00). A person may not be responsible for violating this section if the person produces in court at the adjudicatory hearing a certification card or proof that the person has completed and passed a boating safety course in compliance with subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

No unit of local government shall enact any ordinance or rule relating to boating safety education, and this law preempts all existing ordinances or rules.

An operator of a personal watercraft on the public waters of this State remains subject to any more specific provision of law found in

G.S. 75A-13.3

.

History.

2009-282, s. 1; 2013-380, s. 9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-380, s. 9, effective December 1, 2013, substituted “was born before January 1, 1988” for “is at least 26 years of age” in subdivision (b)(11); and, in subsection (c), substituted “responsible for” for “guilty of,” “G.S. 14-3.1, and shall pay a fine of fifty dollars ($50.00)” for “G.S. 14-3.1. The court shall assess court costs for each violation but shall not assess a penalty” in the first sentence, and in the second sentence, substituted “responsible for” for “convicted of,” deleted “when tried for the offense” following “violating this section if,” and added “at the adjudicatory hearing.” For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 75A-17.
Enforcement of Chapter.

Every wildlife protector and every other law-enforcement officer of this State and its subdivisions shall have the authority to enforce the provisions of this Chapter and in the exercise thereof shall have authority to stop any vessel subject to this Chapter. Wildlife protectors or other law enforcement officers of this State, after having identified themselves as law enforcement officers, shall have authority to board and inspect any vessel subject to this Chapter.

In order to secure broader enforcement of the provisions of this Chapter, the Commission is authorized to enter into an agreement with the Department of Environmental Quality whereby the enforcement personnel of the Department shall assume responsibility for enforcing the provisions of this Chapter in the territory and area normally policed by enforcement personnel of the Commission and whereby the Commission shall contribute a share of the expense of such personnel according to a ratio of time and effort expended by them in enforcing the provisions of this Chapter, when the ratio has been agreed upon by both of the contracting agencies. The agreement may be modified from time to time as conditions may warrant.

Law enforcement vessels may use a flashing blue light on the waters of this State whenever they are engaged in law enforcement or public safety activities. The use of a blue light by any other vessel is prohibited. A person other than a law enforcement officer who activates, installs, or operates a flashing blue light on a vessel other than a law enforcement vessel is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

A siren may not be used on any vessel other than an official law enforcement vessel or other official emergency response vessel.

Vessels operated on the waters of this State shall stop when directed to do so by a law enforcement officer. When stopped, vessels shall remain at idle speed, or shall maneuver in such a way as to permit the officer to come alongside the vessel. Law enforcement officers may direct vessels to stop by using a flashing blue light, a siren, or an oral command by officers in uniform. A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

Vessels operated on the waters of this State shall slow to a no-wake speed when passing within 100 feet of a law enforcement vessel that is displaying a flashing blue light unless the vessel is in a narrow channel. Vessels operated on the waters of this State in a narrow channel shall slow to a no-wake speed when passing within 50 feet of a law enforcement vessel that is displaying a flashing blue light. A person who violates this subsection is responsible for an infraction as provided in

G.S. 14-3.1

.

History.

1959, c. 1064, s. 17; 1965, c. 957, s. 9; 1973, c. 1262, ss. 28, 86; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 218(17); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2006-185, s. 1; 2013-360, s. 18B.15(d); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-185, s. 1, effective January 1, 2007, and applicable to offenses committed on or after January 1, 2007, in subsection (a), substituted “Chapter.
Wildlife protectors or other law enforcement officers of this state” for “Chapter; and” and substituted “themselves as law enforcement officers,” for “himself in his official capacity,”; in subsection (b), in the first sentence, deleted “Wildlife Resources” preceding “Commission” twice, substituted “enforcement personnel of the Commission” for “such enforcement personnel” near the middle, and substituted “the ratio” for “such ratio” near the end, and substituted “The agreement” for “Such agreement” near the beginning of the second sentence; and added subsections (c) through (f).

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 18B.15(d), effective December 1, 2013, substituted “responsible for an infraction as provided in

G.S. 14-3.1

” for “guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor” in subsection (f). For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in subsection (b).

§ 75A-18.
Penalties.

Except as otherwise provided, a person who violates a provision of this Article is responsible for an infraction as provided in

G.S. 14-3.1

. This limitation shall not apply in a case where a more severe penalty is prescribed in this Chapter.

through (e) Repealed by Session Laws 2006-185, s. 1.

(f)

Except as otherwise provided in this Chapter, a person who violates a rule adopted by the Commission under the authority of this Chapter is responsible for an infraction as provided in

G.S. 14-3.1

and shall pay a fine of fifty dollars ($50.00). A person responsible for an infraction under this Chapter shall not be assessed court costs.

History.

1959, c. 1064, s. 18; 1965, c. 634, s. 3; c. 793; 1969, c. 97, s. 2; 1979, c. 761, s. 8; 1985, c. 615, ss. 6, 7; 1989, c. 742, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, ss. 566, 1285; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1997-129, s. 3; 1999-447, s. 2; 2006-185, s. 1; 2013-360, s. 18B.15(e); 2013-380, s. 10.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-185, s. 1, effective January 1, 2007, and applicable to offenses committed on or after January 1, 2007, rewrote the section.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 18B.15(e), effective December 1, 2013, substituted “responsible for an infraction as provided in

G.S. 14-3.1

” for “guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and shall only be subject to a fine not to exceed two hundred and fifty dollars ($250.00) for each violation” in subsection (c). For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2013-380, s. 10, effective December 1, 2013, deleted “or who violates a rule adopted under authority of this Chapter” following “of this Article” in subsection (a); and added subsection (f). For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 75A-19.
Operation of vessels by manufacturers, dealers, etc.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Chapter, the Commission may adopt rules regarding the operation of vessels by manufacturers, distributors, dealers, and demonstrators as the Commission may deem necessary and proper.

History.

1959, c. 1064, s. 181/2; 2006-185, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006, s. 1, effective January 1, 2007, and applicable to offenses committed on or after January 1, 2007, substituted “vessels” for “watercraft” in the section catchline and near the middle, deleted “Wildlife Resources” preceding “Commission” near the beginning and substituted “adopt rules” for “promulgate such rules and regulations” near the middle.